Utah statutes.
53C-1-201.   Creation of administration -- Purpose -- Director.
(1) (a)  There is established within state government the School and
Institutional Trust Lands Administration.
(b)  The administration shall manage all school and institutional trust lands
and assets within the state, except as otherwise provided in Title 53C,
Chapter 3, Deposit and Allocation of Revenue from Trust Lands, and Sections
51-7a-201 and 51-7a-202.
(2)  The administration is an independent state agency and not a division of
any other department.
(3) (a)  It is subject to the usual legislative and executive department
controls except as provided in this Subsection (3).
(b) (i)  The director may make rules as approved by the board that allow the
administration to classify a business proposal submitted to the administration
as protected under Section 63G-2-305, for as long as is necessary to evaluate
the proposal.
(ii)  The administration shall return the proposal to the party who submitted
the proposal, and incur no further duties under Title 63G, Chapter 2,
Government Records Access and Management Act, if the administration determines
not to proceed with the proposal.
(iii)  The administration shall classify the proposal pursuant to law if it
decides to proceed with the proposal.
(iv)  Section 63G-2-403 does not apply during the review period.
(c)  The director shall make rules in compliance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, except that the administration is not
subject to Subsections 63G-3-301(6) and (7), and the director, with the
board's approval, may establish a procedure for the expedited approval of
rules, based on written findings by the director showing:
(i)  the changes in business opportunities affecting the assets of the trust;
(ii)  the specific business opportunity arising out of those changes which may
be lost without the rule or changes to the rule;
(iii)  the reasons the normal procedures under Section 63G-3-301 cannot be met
without causing the loss of the specific opportunity;
(iv)  approval by at least five board members; and
(v)  that the director has filed a copy of the rule and a rule analysis,
stating the specific reasons and justifications for its findings, with the
Division of Administrative Rules and notified interested parties as provided
in Subsection 63G-3-301(10).
(d) (i)  The administration shall comply with Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State
Personnel Management Act, except as provided in this Subsection (3)(d).
(ii)  The board may approve, upon recommendation of the director, that
exemption for specific positions under Subsections 67-19-12(2) and 67-19-15(1)
is required in order to enable the administration to efficiently fulfill its
responsibilities under the law.  The director shall consult with the executive
director of the Department of Human Resource Management prior to making such a
recommendation.
(iii)  The positions of director, deputy director, associate director,
assistant director, legal counsel appointed under Section 53C-1-305,
administrative assistant, and public affairs officer are exempt under
Subsections 67-19-12(2) and 67-19-15(1).
(iv)  Salaries for exempted positions, except for the director, shall be set
by the director, after consultation with the executive director of the
Department of Human Resource Management, within ranges approved by the board.
The board and director shall consider salaries for similar positions in
private enterprise and other public employment when setting salary ranges.
(v)  The board may create an annual incentive and bonus plan for the director
and other administration employees designated by the board, based upon the
attainment of financial performance goals and other measurable criteria
defined and budgeted in advance by the board.
(e)  The administration shall comply with Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah
Procurement Code, except where the board approves, upon recommendation of the
director, exemption from the Utah Procurement Code, and simultaneous adoption
of rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for
procurement, which enable the administration to efficiently fulfill its
responsibilities under the law.
(f) (i)  The board and director shall review the exceptions under this
Subsection (3) and make recommendations for any modification, if required,
which the Legislature would be asked to consider during its annual general
session.
(ii)  The board and director may include in their recommendations any other
proposed exceptions from the usual executive and legislative controls the
board and director consider necessary to accomplish the purpose of this title.
(4)  The administration is managed by a director of school and institutional
trust lands appointed by a majority vote of the board of trustees with the
consent of the governor.
(5) (a)  The board of trustees shall provide policies for the management of
the administration and for the management of trust lands and assets.
(b)  The board shall provide policies for the ownership and control of Native
American remains that are discovered or excavated on school and institutional
trust lands in consultation with the Division of Indian Affairs and giving due
consideration to Title 9, Chapter 9, Part 4, Native American Grave Protection
and Repatriation Act.  The director may make rules in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to implement policies
provided by the board regarding Native American remains.
(6)  In connection with joint ventures for the development of trust lands and
minerals approved by the board under Sections 53C-1-303 and 53C-2-401, the
administration may become a member of a limited liability company under Title
48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act, and is considered
a person under Section 48-2c-102.
